Hawaii statutes.
[§279D-1] Statement of purpose. The
legislature finds that 23 United States Code sections 134-135 and 49 United
States Code sections 5303-5304, as amended, and federal regulations adopted
pursuant thereto, and other federal laws require that metropolitan planning
organizations be designated based on a minimum population threshold as defined
in federal law to act as a decision-making agency and to receive certain funds
for the purpose of carrying out a continuing, cooperative, and comprehensive
transportation planning process.

Metropolitan planning organizations have their
own policy board and staff. It is the responsibility of the policy board to
make decisions that are the result of the continuing, cooperative, and
comprehensive transportation planning process, and the organization's staff
support and provide technical resources to the policy board. The continuing,
cooperative, and comprehensive planning process is designed to provide both
orderly and reasoned metropolitan transportation planning within the framework
of federal law, and adequate and informed representation from state and county
governments, operators of public transportation receiving federal funds, the
public at large, and others as identified in 23 Code of Federal Regulations
section 450 subpart C. [L 2015, c 132, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next